Hawaii statutes.
§441-43 Inspection, regulation, and
supervision of administrator. Any administrator of a perpetual care fund,
other than a trust company, shall be subject to inspection, supervision, and
regulation by the director to the same extent and in the same manner as may be
from time to time provided by law for the inspection, supervision, and
regulation of trust companies doing business in the State. [L 1967, c 199, pt
of §1; HRS §441-43; am L 1975, c 21, §16; am L 1981, c 221, §20]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next